Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-409
Franchisee; action to recover damages; injunction; costs.

Any franchisee may bring an action against its franchisor for violation of sections 87-401 to 87-410 to recover damages sustained by reason of any violation of sections 87-401 to 87-410 and, when appropriate, shall be entitled to injunctive relief. The prevailing party in any action brought pursuant to this section shall be entitled to the costs of the action including but not limited to reasonable attorney's fees.

Laws 1978, LB 202, § 9.